prince/dictionaries/hu.aff
SFX C   0    iméinél      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméinek      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméin        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméiig       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméihez      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméig        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméiből      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméiben      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméibe       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméi         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméhez       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iméből       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imében       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imébe        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imé          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imtől        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imről        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imre         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imnél        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imnek        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    immé         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    immel        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imként       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imkor        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imig         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imhez        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imet         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imen         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imből        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imben        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    imbe         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    im           [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikül         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéül        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéért       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikévé        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikével       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikétől       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikét         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéről       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikért        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikére        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikénél       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iként        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikének       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikén         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiül       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiért      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéivé       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéivel      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéitől      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéit        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiről      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéire       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéinél      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéinek      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéin        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiig       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéihez      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéig        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiből      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéiben      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéibe       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéi         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéhez       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikéből       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikében       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikébe        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iké          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iktől        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikről        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikre         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikor         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iknél        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iknek        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikként       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikké         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikkor        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikkel        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikig         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikhez        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iket         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iken         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikből        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikben        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ikbe         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ik           [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iig          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ihez         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idül         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéül        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéért       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idévé        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idével       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idétől       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idét         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéről       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idért        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idére        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idénél       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idének       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idén         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiül       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiért      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéivé       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéivel      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéitől      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéit        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiről      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéire       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéinél      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéinek      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéin        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiig       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéihez      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéig        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiből      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéiben      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéibe       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéi         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéhez       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idéből       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idében       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idébe        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idé          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idtől        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idről        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idre         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idnél        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idnek        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idként       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idkor        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idig         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idhez        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idet         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iden         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iddé         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iddel        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idből        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idben        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    idbe         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    id           [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iből         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    iben         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ibe          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    i            [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dül          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dön          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déül         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déért        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dévé         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dével        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    détől        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dét          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déről        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dért         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dére         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dénél        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dének        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dén          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékül        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékön        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéül       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéért      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékévé       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékével      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékétől      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékét        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéről      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékért       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékére       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékénél      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékének      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékén        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiül      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiért     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéivé      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéivel     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéitől     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéit       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiről     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéire      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéinél     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéinek     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéin       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiig      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéihöz     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéig       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiből     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéiben     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéibe      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéi        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéhöz      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékéből      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékében      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékébe       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déké         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déktől       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékről       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékre        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déknél       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déknek       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékké        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékkel       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékig        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékhöz       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déket        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékből       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékben       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dékbe        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dék          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiül        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiért       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déivé        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déivel       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déitől       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déit         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiről       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déire        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déinél       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déinek       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déin         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiig        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déihöz       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déig         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiből       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déiben       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déibe        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déi          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déhöz        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    déből        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dében        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    débe         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dé           [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dtől         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dről         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dre          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dnél         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dnek         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dként        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dkor         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dig          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dhöz         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    det          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ddé          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    ddel         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dből         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dben         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    dbe          [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    d            [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéül       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéért      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskévé       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskével      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskétől      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskét        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéről      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskére       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskénél      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskének      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskén        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékül      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékért     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéktől     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékről     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékre      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéknél     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéknek     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékké      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékkel     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékig      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékhez     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéket      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéken      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékből     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékben     [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskékbe      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskék        [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéig       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéhez      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskéből      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskében      [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cskébe       [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX C   0    cske         [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
